Nebraska, session 109, LB847A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB847A LB847A
2026 2026
Section 1. Laws 2025, LB261, section 87, is amended to read:
Sec. 87. AGENCY NO. 23 — DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Program No. 31 - Division of Employment
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
CASH FUND XXX XXX
CASH FUND 13,082,081 13,104,750
FEDERAL FUND est. XXX XXX
FEDERAL FUND est. 48,800,427 49,608,896
PROGRAM TOTAL XXX XXX
PROGRAM TOTAL 61,882,508 62,713,646
SALARY LIMIT 23,368,597 23,873,143
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$9,883,387 Cash Funds for state aid for workforce development, which
shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $9,880,259 Cash Funds for
state aid for workforce development, which shall only be used for such
purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$116,613 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $119,741 Cash Funds for the
administration of the workforce development program.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$1,600,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $XXX $1,600,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be
used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$7,904,743 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $7,904,743 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which
shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program Federal Funds
-2-

LB847A LB847A
2026 2026
made available to the state under section 903(d) and 903(f) of the
federal Social Security Act, as amended, in the amount of $2,500,000 in
FY2025-26 and $2,500,000 in FY2026-27, or so much thereof as may be
necessary, to be used for the administration of the Employment Security
Law and public employment offices, including the administration of one-
stop career centers to the extent authorized under the federal Social
Security Act and the Wagner-Peyser Act and the rules and regulations
adopted pursuant thereto. The expenditure or other disposition of section
903(d) and 903(f) money appropriated in this section shall be accounted
for in accordance with standards established by the United States
Secretary of Labor. Except as provided in this section, all provisions of
subsection (2) of section 48-621 except subdivision (2)(a)(i) shall apply
to this appropriation.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance for workforce
development existing on June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 2. Laws 2025, LB261, section 88, is amended to read:
Sec. 88. AGENCY NO. 23 — DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Program No. 194 - Division for Protection of People and Property
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 764,157 -0-
GENERAL FUND 764,157 779,383
CASH FUND XXX XXX
CASH FUND 687,811 709,750
FEDERAL FUND est. 822,851 828,634
PROGRAM TOTAL XXX XXX
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,274,819 2,317,767
SALARY LIMIT XXX XXX
SALARY LIMIT 1,315,258 1,346,619
Sec. 3. Laws 2025, LB261, section 247, is amended to read:
Sec. 247. AGENCY NO. 72 — DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
Program No. 604 - Business Incentives
-3-

LB847A LB847A
2026 2026
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 2,460,522 2,460,522
CASH FUND 54,000,000 50,000,000
PROGRAM TOTAL 56,460,522 52,460,522
SALARY LIMIT 1,329,007 1,329,007
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$50,000,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund as
state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included
in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $50,000,000 Cash Funds
from the Nebraska Transformational Project Fund as state aid, which shall
only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$4,000,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $-0- Cash Funds from the ImagiNE
Nebraska Revolving Loan Fund for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
The unexpended Cash Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, less $-0-, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 4. Original Laws 2025, LB261, sections 87, 88, and 247, are
repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-